Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE H. RESEARCH IN HIGHER EDUCATION

CHAPTER 154. CONSORTIUM OF ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE CENTERS

Sec. 154.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "council" means the Texas Council on Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.001 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 154.002. CONSORTIUM; CLINICAL CENTERS. (a) The council shall establish a consortium of Alzheimer's disease centers, to be initially composed of the Alzheimer's disease centers at the Baylor College of Medicine, the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, and The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center. The council may add additional consortium participants to the consortium as necessary.

(b) The council shall provide funds to the consortium participants to assist those participants to develop clinical centers that meet the standards of the consortium.

(c) A participant's clinical center may employ any personnel necessary to support its activities, including clinical, administrative, and data management personnel.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.002 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 154.003. PROGRAMS. (a) The consortium shall coordinate and direct its programs to provide to the extent practicable centralized, uniform services among the consortium participants.

(b) The consortium shall:

(1) offer clinical services to all patients of the consortium's clinical centers, notwithstanding the independent status of each participant;

(2) establish a database for:

(A) making data available to each consortium participant according to its specific activities;

(B) providing a resource index to facilitate research projects; and

(C) providing data on patient health outcomes to appropriate state agencies and to researchers in this state; and

(3) with the aid of the council and the National Alzheimer's Association or its affiliate, develop and distribute to patients, caregivers, and health care professionals educational materials and services and inform patients of any research projects and therapeutic trials open for their participation.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.003 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 154.004. STEERING COMMITTEE. To advise the council on consortium activities, the council shall establish a steering committee composed of one representative from each consortium participant.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.004 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 154.005. DATA COORDINATING CENTER. (a) The council shall establish a data coordinating center to be located at the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center. To the extent practicable, the center shall be operated in association with the data management operations of that institution's Alzheimer's disease center.

(b) The data coordinating center shall establish a database and make data available to each consortium participant according to the specific activities of the participant.

(c) The council shall appoint a physician or other person with a similar clinical background to administer the center.

(d) The person administering the center may employ any personnel necessary to support the center's activities, including a project coordinator. The person may require the project coordinator to hold a master's or doctoral degree related to public health.

(e) The project coordinator shall coordinate the center's activities among the center, the consortium participants, the council, and the public.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.005 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 154.006. FUNDING. (a) The council may receive state appropriated funds for the purpose of supporting the research activities of the consortium under this chapter.

(b) The council may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations for purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.006 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 154.007. ACCESS TO DATA. (a) The council may restrict access to the data maintained by the consortium or data coordinating center to consortium participants that contribute data as requested by the council.

(b) The steering committee periodically shall review and evaluate the availability and sharing of data under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 151.007 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 154.008. PERFORMANCE REVIEW. The council, with recommendations from the steering committee, shall review and evaluate the performance of the consortium participants and data coordinating center at least every five years.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code, Sec. 105.008 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(50), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.